data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
REP -inu            inú
REP -iro            irô
REP -jornali        jornalí
REP -jui            juí
REP -juri           jurí
REP -la             lá
REP -laborato       laborató
REP -larva          larvá
REP -le             lé
REP -le             lê
REP -lenda          lendá
REP -leta           letá
REP -leuce          leucê
REP -li             lí
REP -litera         literá
REP -litu           litú
REP -lo             ló
REP -logari         logarí
REP -logi           logí
REP -lu             lú
REP -lue            lué
REP -luna           luná
REP -luterani       luteraní
REP -ma             má
REP -ma             mã
REP -magne          magné
REP -mala           malá
REP -marxi          marxí
REP -mate           maté
REP -me             mé
REP -me             mê
REP -meca           mecâ
REP -memo           memó
REP -meta           metá
REP -metafi         metafí
REP -mi             mí
REP -miaste         miastê
REP -miliona        milioná
REP -ministe        ministé
REP -mne            mné
REP -mo             mó
REP -mona           moná
REP -monitora       monitorá
REP -monopo         monopó
REP -monopoli       monopolí
REP -mu             mú
REP -mutage         mutagê
REP -na             ná
REP -nacionali      nacionalí
REP -narco          narcó
REP -nazi           nazí
REP -ne             nê
REP -nego           negó
REP -negocia        negociá
REP -neopla         neoplá
REP -neura          neurá
REP -ni             ní
REP -nivela         nivelá
REP -no             nó
REP -no             nô
REP -nobilia        nobiliá
REP -noti           notí
REP -nu             nú
REP -numera         numerá
REP -o              ó
REP -obrigata       obrigatá
REP -observato      observató
REP -obsta          obstá
REP -oculta         ocultá
REP -ocupa          ocupá
REP -ofi            ofí
REP -ofta           oftá
REP -oli            olí
REP -oliga          oligá
REP -orga           orgá
REP -orga           orgâ
REP -ota            otá
REP -oxida          oxidá
REP -oxige          oxigê
REP -pa             pá
REP -pa             pâ
REP -paradisi       paradisí
REP -parali         paralí
REP -parasi         parasí
REP -parasita       parasitá
REP -parlamentari   parlamentarí
REP -parti          partí
REP -paupe          paupé
REP -pe             pé
REP -peri           perí
REP -perio          perió
REP -permea         permeá
REP -pestile        pestilê
REP -pioge          piogê
REP -pire           piré
REP -pla            plá
REP -po             pó
REP -poe            poé
REP -pole           polê
REP -poli           polí
REP -porta          portá
REP -pote           potê
REP -pra            prá
REP -pre            prê
REP -pro            pró
REP -programa       programá
REP -propaga        propagá
REP -psicana        psicaná
REP -psicanali      psicanalí
REP -psico          psicó
REP -psiquia        psiquiá
REP -pu             pú
REP -publicita      publicitá
REP -qui            quí
REP -ra             rá
REP -radiogra       radiográ
REP -refere         referê
REP -regenera       regenerá
REP -renova         renová
REP -renu           renú
REP -reproduto      reprodutó
REP -resfria        resfriá
REP -salda          saldã
REP -sarca          sarcá
REP -sate           saté
REP -sauda          saudá
REP -se             sé
REP -seleciona      selecioná
REP -sensi          sensí
REP -sime           simé
REP -simpa          simpá
REP -so             sô
REP -soma           somá
REP -sovie          sovié
REP -suficie        suficiê
REP -sugestiona     sugestioná
REP -sustenta       sustentá
REP -ta             tá
REP -te             té
REP -te             tê
REP -tei            teí
REP -telesco        telescó
REP -teocra         teocrá
REP -tera           terá
REP -terna          terná
REP -terrori        terrorí
REP -teta           tetâ
REP -ti             tí
REP -to             tó
REP -to             tô
REP -torpe          torpé
REP -totalita       totalitá
REP -tra            trá
REP -translu        translú
REP -transpare      transparê
REP -trigonome      trigonomé
REP -tro            tró
REP -tu             tú
REP -u              ú
REP -unita          unitá
REP -universita     universitá
REP -urbani         urbaní
REP -usua           usuá
REP -utilita        utilitá
REP -va             vá
REP -ve             vé
REP -vei            veí
REP -velo           veló
REP -vene           vené
REP -vi             ví
REP -vila           vilã
REP -viole          violê
REP -visa           visã
REP -viso           visó
REP -vive           vivê
REP -voca           vocá
REP -vulca          vulcã
REP -vulnera        vulnerá
REP -zi             zí
REP -zigo           zigó
REP -zinco          zincó


# ================================================================
# PREFIXOS - Estão identificados por letras acentuadas.
#            ÀÁÂÃÄÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÒÓÔÕÖÙÚÛÜÑÝàáâãäèéêëìíîïòóôõöùúûüñÿ
# ================================================================

PFX À Y 3
PFX À   0     re      [^rs]
PFX À   0     rer     r
PFX À   0     res     s

PFX Á Y 4
PFX Á   0     anti    [^iíhrs]
PFX Á   0     anti-   [iíh]
PFX Á   0     antir   r
PFX Á   0     antis   s

PFX Â Y 1
PFX Â   0     des     .

PFX Ã Y 4
PFX Ã   0     auto    [^oóôhrs]
PFX Ã   0     auto-   [oóôh] 
PFX Ã   0     autor   r
PFX Ã   0     autos   s

PFX Ä Y 4
PFX Ä   0     in      [^blmnpr]
PFX Ä   0     im      [bp]
PFX Ä   0     i       [lmn]
PFX Ä   0     ir      r

PFX È Y 2
PFX È   0     sub    [^bhr]
PFX È   0     sub-   [bhr]

PFX É Y 4
PFX É   0     neo    [^oóôhrs]
PFX É   0     neo-   [oóôh]
PFX É   0     neor   r
PFX É   0     neos   s


PFX Ê Y 1
PFX Ê   0     tragi   .

PFX Ë Y 4
PFX Ë   0     sobre   [^eéêhrs]
PFX Ë   0     sobre-  [eéêh]
PFX Ë   0     sobrer  r
PFX Ë   0     sobres  s

PFX Ì Y 2
PFX Ì   0     super   [^hr]
PFX Ì   0     super-  [rh]

PFX Í Y 2
PFX Í   0     inter   [^hr]
PFX Í   0     inter-  [rh]

PFX Î Y 2
PFX Î   0     hiper   [^hr]
PFX Î   0     hiper-  [rh]

PFX Ï Y 4
PFX Ï   0     ante    [^eéêhrs]
PFX Ï   0     ante-   [eéêh]
PFX Ï   0     anter   r
PFX Ï   0     antes   s

PFX Ò Y 4
PFX Ò   0     arqui   [^iíhrs]
PFX Ò   0     arqui-  [iíh]
PFX Ò   0     arquir  r
PFX Ò   0     arquis  s

PFX Ó Y 4
PFX Ó   0     contra   [^aáâhrs]
PFX Ó   0     contra-  [aáâh]
PFX Ó   0     contrar  r
PFX Ó   0     contras  s

PFX Ô Y 4
PFX Ô   0     extra   [^aáâhrs]
PFX Ô   0     extra-  [aáâh]
PFX Ô   0     extrar  r
PFX Ô   0     extras  s

PFX Õ Y 4
PFX Õ   0     infra   [^aáâhrs]
PFX Õ   0     infra-  [aáâh]
PFX Õ   0     infrar  r
PFX Õ   0     infras  s

PFX Ö Y 4
PFX Ö   0     intra   [^aáâhrs]
PFX Ö   0     intra-  [aáâh]
PFX Ö   0     intrar  r
PFX Ö   0     intras  s

PFX Ù Y 4
PFX Ù   0     proto   [^oóôhrs]
PFX Ù   0     proto-  [oóôh]
PFX Ù   0     protor  r
PFX Ù   0     protos  s

PFX Ú Y 4
PFX Ú   0     pseudo   [^oóôhrs]
PFX Ú   0     pseudo-  [oóôh]
PFX Ú   0     pseudor  r
PFX Ú   0     pseudos  s

PFX Û Y 1
PFX Û   0     pro     .

PFX Ü Y 4
PFX Ü   0     semi    [^iíhrs]
PFX Ü   0     semi-   [iíh]
PFX Ü   0     semir   r
PFX Ü   0     semis   s

PFX Ñ Y 4
PFX Ñ   0     co      [^hrs]
PFX Ñ   h     co      h
PFX Ñ   0     cor     r
PFX Ñ   0     cos     s

PFX à Y 4
PFX à   0     ultra   [^aáâhrs]
PFX à   0     ultra-  [aáâh]
PFX à   0     ultrar  r
PFX à   0     ultras  s

PFX á Y 1
PFX á   0     aero    .

PFX â Y 1
PFX â   0     anfi    .

PFX ã Y 1
PFX ã   0     bio     .

PFX ä Y 1
PFX ä   0     cis     .

PFX è Y 1
PFX è   0     hepta   .

PFX é Y 4
PFX é   0     hexa   [^aáâhrs]
PFX é   0     hexa-  [aáâh]
PFX é   0     hexar  r
PFX é   0     hexas  s



PFX ê Y 1
PFX ê   0     penta   .

PFX ë Y 1
PFX ë   0     pos     .

PFX ì Y 1
PFX ì   0     pre     .

PFX í Y 1
PFX í   0     sesqui  .

PFX î Y 1
PFX î   0     trans   .

PFX ï Y 1
PFX ï   0     zoo     .

PFX ò Y 1
PFX ò   0     a       .

PFX ó Y 2
PFX ó   0     as      s
PFX ó   0     ar      r

PFX ô Y 4
PFX ô   0     supra   [^aáâhrs]
PFX ô   0     supra-  [aáâh]
PFX ô   0     suprar  r
PFX ô   0     supras  s
