data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.dic
anual/BJXZ2HRVÜ
aprazível/BKX13IÂ
aquecer/akMbjÂÀËÌìÃ
aromático/DK13öÚ
azotêmico/DÎ
balcânico/Däî
báltico/DäÑ
beneficiar/akYMjLÃÜÎÌÈ
beneficiário/DÑ
bilabiado/DÈ
biólogo/Dòâû
blenorrágico/DÁÚ
bobinar/akYMjLÂÀ
branco/DQRÁÌÜÚ
brocos/ò
butílico/DÚ
cadência/BÁÍ
camarista/BÒ
campeonato/BPRÌéê
campo/BÈÙùÔÓÌÎÏÁÃÉÜàáã
candidatar/akYMjLÀÃÈÌ
capilarizar/akYjLÂÀËÌ
caraterístico/DK13Ä
católico/DÁÉÎÚÜ
caucásico/Däî
cedente/BÍÏ
cefálico/DÃòÚÛâëöûõ
célico/DÙÚÛáâ
cênio/Bëù
cêntrico/DÃòáâéêöùã
centrífugo/Dà
chocar/akYMjLò
ciberneticístico/DK13ã
cimentação/BQWÂ
cístico/DK13Ôìö
clavicular/BRÈÍÕ
cloretano/Dé
clorito/BÎù
clorofeno/Bé
cocáceo/DÙû
colar/akYMjLÀÂÓÙòÜî
colonista/BÁ
comédia/BÊ
comediografia/BÊ
comediográfico/DKÊ
comediógrafo/DÊ
cômico/DKÊÉòÜ
comiserativo/DXJÃ
compositor/DRÌ
côncavo/DÀÈ
concorrente/BJÁÌÎà
concretos/JZ2Ä
condicionar/akYMjLÀÂòìú
constitucional/BJXZ2HRVÁÄÂúÕ
cônsul/üÛ
contínuo/DÂÄÚÜ
cor/BÂÏÉ
costal/BÈÌÍÔÕÖ
cota/B2Ë
coxálgico/DÚ
criptografar/akYjLÂÃÀ
cromia/B2ÃÎöÚâ
crural/BÈ
datação/BQWÏú
dátilo/DËÁÎòêöûõ
decaédrico/Dèé
decaedro/Bèé
decagonal/BJXZ2HRVèéê
decágono/Dèéê
decano/DÈèé
decimal/BJXZ2HRVéú
dental/BRVÍòÈË
dependência/BÄÍ
devagar/Ì
devasso/DXÒ
diafanometria/B2á
diartrose/Bâ
digestor/DRã
dimensionar/akYMjLÀÌÈÃÍÎàõûú
dique/BÓ
disciplinar/akYMJjLÃÄî
disposto/DÄì
dissolução/BQWÄ
ditadura/BËÛ
diurese/BÎ
donte/BPÚâûõ
dural/BÔÈ
editar/akYjLÀÑ
edução/BQWÀÂÁ
embrionário/DKÛúÔÜ
embrutecer/akMbjÂ
entristecer/akMbjÂ
epíscopo/BÒÑ
episterno/DÕ
erguer/akMbjÀËÜ
eritritila/Bê
escolástico/DÁÉ
espaço/BPÈÎáÜ
espatário/DÙ
espinal/BRVÈÖ
estrutura/BÈÌÕàõ
europeu/DÁÍîÈÉÔà
exemplo/BÓ
exploração/BQWÄËÌÎ
farsa/BÊ
febril/BJXZ2HRÁÏÈ
fenomenólogo/Dã
ferrálito/BÚ
fiel/CJRÄÌ
figurável/KXIÂìî
filhar/akYjLÀÂ
filtrar/akYMjLÀÄàìî
filtro/BàáãìÌ
financeiro/DJÍ
fitografia/Bï
focal/BÎÔ
fono/Bòèáû
forte/BOPQRVHJÌÓà
fotogramétrico/Dá
fototropia/ZÛ
frasear/eoYMjLÀÁ
friburguês/É
gametófita/BÙ
gangético/DK13äî
gastura/Bò
genético/DK13ÃÉÎòÛáâö
geografia/BÙãïûõ
gerir/hrMjLÃÄÑ
glandular/BRÖ
glotal/BÕô
glótico/DK13ÈÕòÛôö
gnosia/BÎòáãÃ
gracioso/DJXHZOPÂÄ
grafômano/DÃ
imagem/BÒÌÃ
imperial/BJXZ2HRVúÉ
impregnável/KXIÂÌÎ
incluir/cmjLÀÂÃÈËÌÜú
interessar/akYjLÂÑ
internação/BQWÂÀ
jampear/eoYMjLÂÀÃÈÓÜ
jônico/DK13ÙÛ
jordano/Däî
juraico/Dô
justiniano/DÏ
lação/BÀÏÛÄ
latria/BÃï
legal/BJXZ2HRVÁÔÜÌÄ
letárgico/DÁ
libar/akYjLÏìÄ
libetenite/DPOÚ
ligável/KXIÀÂÑ
limitação/BQWîÑÄ
lírico/DàÄ
lope/BÍ
lúdico/DëìÌ
malhar/akYMjLÀÂÓòî
marechal/BRVÒ
marginal/BJXZ2HRVÈÔÖô
mastite/BPÕ
mecânico/DKÎÃáãûÜ
médico/DÁÒÙÜÍáãúÚ
melia/BÉöûõ
mentação/BQWÂòÑ
metafosfato/Bé
mídia/BÎûÌ
mina/BÏÖèÄ
miniaturização/BQWÈÃÌÎÜàú
minutar/akYMjLÓ
mochinho/BË
molestar/akYMjLò
montanha/BÏ
montano/DÍàäî
morfismo/B3ÃÉÎòÚÛã
morfose/BÃÉòÚÛáãï
moroso/DJXHZOPÀ
mundano/DXZÔà
nacional/BJXZ2HRVÁÂÍÔÈÖòÜôàîõ
natural/JXZ2HRVÂÁËÌÓÔÜôàî
nauta/BZ2ÒÙá
nerítico/DK13Õ
net/ÍÔÖ
nevrítico/DK13Úö
no/DÁÌÛèé
nomear/eoYjLÀÃËÏòìÑ
nua/BOJÜ
nupcial/JXZ2HRVÁÏú
ocupar/akYjLÀÂÏúÌÎÑ
oftálmico/DÁ
oleato/BÈí
oligarca/BÒ
opinar/akYMjLÀì
orbital/RVÈ
orgânico/DKÄÎÌÍÔÖ
osculação/BQWÄÌÎ
óxido/BÌíöÎ
paroxítono/DÛ
partidário/DK13ÍÔòôÖ
pedal/BJXZ2HRVÓÜí
perfuração/BQWÄÁÃÈÌÜàãû
personalismo/B3ÄÂ
planar/akYMjLòá
platense/Bä
pontar/akYMjLÀÂÄÓë
população/BQWÂËÈÌ
posição/BQWÀËÈÌÏÓÔÛëìîÍ
prioresa/BÈÒ
profético/DK13Ú
propor/hrÀÓ
provincial/BJXZ2HRVÍÔ
púbico/DÈôú
pureza/Bà
rasourar/akYMjLó
regional/BJXZ2HRVîÈ
relhar/akYMjLó
resistente/BJàÎÌ
responsabilizável/KXIÂÄ
rinconar/akYMjLó
ruinação/BQWó
segregação/BQWÂÃ
serrano/DÈä
sibilístico/DK13ë
sinapse/Bó
sineu/Bò
social/BJXZ2HRVÄÍ
sovietismo/B3Á
sujeitar/akYMjLó
sustentação/BQWÎÃ
tálamo/BÈÉòâöù
tarsal/BÖ
técnico/DÉòáãïöüÌ
teína/Bä
temperatura/BË
temporal/BJXZ2HRVÄÈÍÔÕò
tércio/Dí
tério/DÙë
terossauro/DÛ
terpênico/Dí
terpeno/Bíö
tetraedro/Bé
tômico/DKãéêïöùû
tonar/akYMjLÂÄòÛÜö
tonicidade/BÎòÛëìù
tônico/DK13ÁËÍÎòÛÜèéëìöùÈ
tonométrico/Dá
toxina/BQÃÁÙãÚ
treinar/akYMjLÂÀÃÌ
trófico/DÃÎÙïöù
turbação/BQWÍã
uniõezinhas/ÀÂ
uveiro/DÑ
venoso/DJXHZOPÂÃÍÖ
ventricular/BRÍÔÕÖô
ver/hrjÀÂÍÏ
virgem/BÜÔ
virtuoso/DJXHZOPÂÄ
zelandês/DÉOP
zigomático/DK13È
